District of Columbia statutes.
7-218

Reproduction.

The Registrar may prepare typewritten, photographic, electronic, or other reproductions of certificates or reports in order to preserve the vital records. Such reproductions shall be accepted as the original records when certified by the Registrar. The documents from which permanent reproductions have been made and verified may be disposed of as provided by regulation.

History

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 19, 28 DCR 3271

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-218.